Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB76.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 68.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court of each county having a population of five[three] hundred thousand
(500,000)[(300,000)] or more may by order or resolution impose license fees on
franchises, provide for licensing any business, trade, occupation, or profession, and
the using, holding, or exhibiting of any animal, article, or other thing.
(2) License fees on such business, trade, occupation, or profession for revenue
purposes, except those of the common schools, shall be imposed at a percentage
rate not to exceed one and one-fourth percent (1.25%) of:
(a) Salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation earned by persons
within the county for work done and services performed or rendered in the
county; and
(b) The net profits of businesses, trades, professions, or occupations from
activities conducted in the county.
(3) (a) No public service company that pays an ad valorem tax shall be required to
pay a license tax.
(b) 1. It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue the exemption from
local license fees and occupational taxes that existed on January 1, 2006,
for providers of multichannel video programming services or
communications services as defined in KRS 136.602 that were taxed
under KRS 136.120 prior to January 1, 2006.
2. To further this intent, no company providing multichannel video
programming services or communications services as defined in KRS
136.602 shall be required to pay a license tax. If only a portion of an
entity's business is providing multichannel video programming services
or communications services, including products or services that are
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/13/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1569
related to and provided in support of the multichannel video
programming services or communications services, this exclusion
applies only to that portion of the business that provides multichannel
video programming services or communications services, including
products or services that are related to and provided in support of the
multichannel video programming services or communications services
or communications services.
(c) No license tax shall be imposed upon or collected from any bank, trust
company, combined bank and trust company, combined trust, banking and
title business in this state, any savings and loan association, whether state or
federally chartered.
(d) No license tax shall be imposed upon income received by members of the
Kentucky National Guard for active duty training, unit training assemblies,
and annual field training.
(e) No license tax shall be imposed upon income received by precinct workers for
election training or work at election booths in state, county, and local primary,
regular, or special elections.
(f) No license tax shall be imposed upon any profits, earnings, or distributions of
an investment fund which would qualify under KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-
284 to the extent any profits, earnings, or distributions would not be taxable to
an individual investor, or in other cases where the county is prohibited by law
from imposing a license tax.
(g) 1. No license tax shall be imposed upon:
a. The profits earned; or
b. Income received for work performed;
during a disaster response period by a disaster response business or a
disaster response employee.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/13/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1569
2. As used in this paragraph, "disaster response business," "disaster
response employee," and "disaster response period" have the same
meaning as in KRS 141.010.
(4) The provisions and limitations of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to
license fees imposed for regulatory purposes as to form and amount, or to the
license fees authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488.
(5) Pursuant to this section, no fiscal court shall regulate any aspect of the manner in
which any duly ordained, commissioned, or denominationally licensed minister of
religion may perform his or her duties and activities as a minister of religion. Duly
ordained, commissioned, or denominationally licensed ministers of religion shall be
subject to the same license fees imposed on others in the county on salaries, wages,
commissions, and other compensation earned for work done and services performed
or rendered.
Section 2. KRS 68.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court of each county having a population of five[three] hundred thousand
(500,000)[(300,000)] or more may provide for the levy, assessment, and collection
of the license fees authorized by KRS 68.180 and 160.482 to 160.488, provide for
the issuance and enforcement of licenses, and specify the county governmental
purposes to which the revenue derived from license fees authorized by KRS 68.180
shall be applied.
(2) In making the provisions described in subsection (1), and without limiting them, the
fiscal court may, by resolution or order, adopt reasonable rules or regulations
requiring the preparation and filing of timely, accurate, and truthful returns,
accounts, and license applications which will aid in the determination of the amount
of the fee.
Section 3. KRS 160.482 is amended to read as follows:
To help provide for an efficient system of common schools in any county having
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/13/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1569
five[three] hundred thousand (500,000)[(300,000)] or more inhabitants, the General
Assembly delegates to the fiscal courts and boards of education of any such county the
powers and duties set forth in KRS 160.482 to 160.488. The General Assembly finds and
declares that in any such county there are besetting public education special problems
which can best be solved pursuant to KRS 160.482 to 160.488. Furthermore, the General
Assembly declares that the public policy of the Commonwealth is not offended but is best
served by the authority of KRS 160.482 to 160.488 for the imposition, payment, and
collection of license fees on businesses, trades, occupations, and professions over and
above license fees that may already be imposed thereon.
Section 4. KRS 160.607 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The school tax authorized by KRS 160.482 to 160.488 and 160.605 shall be at a
single uniform rate not to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) and shall continue
from year to year until changed as prescribed in KRS 160.635 and 160.484.
(2) Any county having five[three] hundred thousand (500,000)[(300,000)] or more
inhabitants is authorized to increase the school tax rate to exceed the maximum set
in subsection (1) of this section by one-quarter of one percent (0.25%).
Section 5. This Act takes effect August 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/13/2026 10:06 AM Jacketed